California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1322.

The proceedings under this chapter for the suspension or revocation of a license or registration shall be conducted in accordance with Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 220, Sec. 7.   Effective August 4, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1323.

The department may temporarily suspend a license or registration prior to any hearing, when it has determined that the action is necessary to protect the public welfare. The department shall notify the licensee or registrant of the temporary suspension and the effective date thereof and at the same time shall serve the licensee or registrant with an accusation. Upon receipt of a notice of defense by the licensee or registrant, the matter shall, within 15 days, be set for hearing. The hearing shall be held as soon as possible, but not later than 30 days after receipt of that notice. The temporary suspension shall remain in effect until the time the hearing is completed and the department has made a final determination on the merits. However, the temporary suspension shall be deemed vacated if the department fails to make a final decision within 60 days after the hearing has been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1324.

Except for a person or entity whose license was revoked automatically under Section 1265, no person or entity who has owned or operated a clinical laboratory that had its license or registration revoked may, within two years of the revocation of the license or registration, own or operate a laboratory for which a license or registration has been issued under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1325.

Notwithstanding Sections 1267 and 1322, the license or registration of a clinical laboratory that has been excluded from participation under the Medicare program (Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.)), under the Medicaid Program (Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.)), or that had its certificate revoked under CLIA, shall be automatically suspended by the department for the period the laboratory is so excluded or has its certificate revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1326.

The department may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto in the superior court in and for the county in which the violation occurred or is about to occur. Any proceeding under this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the department shall not be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or irreparable damage or loss. With respect to any action brought pursuant to this action alleging actual violation of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the court shall, if it finds the allegations to be true, issue its order enjoining the discontinuance of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 927, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

1327.

The department may enter into agreements with the Secretary of Health and Human Services for the use of the services or facilities of the department for carrying out the provisions of CLIA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Dentistry [1600. - 1976.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [1600. - 1621.]

1600.

This chapter constitutes the chapter on dentistry of the Business and Professions Code. It may be known and cited as the Dental Practice Act.

Whenever a reference is made to the Dental Practice Act by the provisions of any statute, it shall be construed as referring to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 415.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.1.

(a) There shall be in the Department of Consumer Affairs the Dental Board of California in which the administration of this chapter is vested. The board shall consist of eight practicing dentists, two registered dental assistants, and five public members. Of the eight practicing dentists, one shall be a member of a faculty of any California dental college, and one shall be a dentist practicing in a nonprofit community clinic. The appointing powers, described in Section 1603, may appoint to the board a person who was a member of the prior board. The board shall be organized into standing committees dealing with examinations, enforcement, and other subjects as the board deems appropriate.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, any reference in this chapter to the Board of
 Dental Examiners shall be deemed to refer to the Dental Board of California.

(c) The board shall have all authority previously vested in the existing board under this chapter. The board may enforce all disciplinary actions undertaken by the previous board.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 1.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.2.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Dental Board of California in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.3.

(a) All committees of the board have the authority to evaluate all suggestions or requests for regulatory changes related to their committee. Committees shall have the authority to hold informational hearings in order to report and make appropriate recommendations to the board, after consultation with departmental legal counsel and the board’s chief executive officer. The committees shall include in any report regarding a proposed regulatory change, at a minimum, the specific language or the proposed change or changes and the reasons therefor and any facts supporting the need for the change.

(b) No part of this section shall restrict the Dental Hygiene Board of California from adopting, amending, or revoking regulations
 authorized by Article 9 (commencing with Section 1900).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 858, Sec. 3.   (SB 1482)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.4.

(a) (1) The board shall review both of the following:

(A) Available data on all adverse events related to general anesthesia and deep sedation, moderate sedation, and minimal sedation in dentistry.

(B) Relevant professional guidelines, recommendations, or best practices for the provision of dental anesthesia and sedation care. 

(2) By January 1, 2022, the board shall report to the Legislature any findings pursuant to this subdivision that are relevant to inform dental anesthesia and sedation standards.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) The board shall provide a report on pediatric deaths related to general anesthesia and deep sedation in dentistry at the time of its sunset review pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1601.1.

(c) The board shall retain available data on all adverse events related to general anesthesia and deep sedation, moderate sedation, and minimal sedation in dentistry for not less than 15 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 1.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.8.

For purposes of training standards for general anesthesia, deep sedation, and moderate sedation, the board may approve a training standard in lieu of Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) certification if the training standard is an equivalent or higher level of training for pediatric dental anesthesia-related emergencies than PALS certification that includes, but is not limited to, pediatric life support and airway management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 3.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

All of the members of the board, except the public members, shall have been actively and lawfully engaged in the practice of dentistry in the State of California, for at least five years next preceding the date of their appointment. The registered dental assistant members shall have been a registered dental assistant, in the State of California for at least five years next preceding the date of their appointment. The public members shall not be licensees of the board or of any other board under this division or of any board referred to in Sections 1000 and 3600. No more than one member of the board shall be a member of the faculty of any dental college or dental department of any medical college in the State of California. None of the members, including the public members,
 shall have any financial interest in any such college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 3.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.

(a) Except for the initial appointments, members of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years, and each member shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of the member’s successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever first occurs.

(b) A vacancy occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term, within 30 days after it occurs.

(c) No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two terms.

(d) The Governor shall appoint three
 of the public members,
 the two registered dental assistant members, and the eight licensed dentist members of the board. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(e) Of the initial appointments, one of the dentist members and one of the public members appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of one year. Two of the dentist members appointed by the Governor shall each serve for a term of two years. One of the public members and two of the dentist members appointed by the Governor shall each serve a term of three years. The registered dental assistant members and the remaining three dentist members appointed by the Governor shall each serve for a term of four years. The public members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each serve for a term
 of four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 4.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.1.

A member of the Dental Board of California who has served two terms shall not be eligible for reappointment to the board. In computing two terms hereunder, that portion of an unexpired term that a member fills as a result of a vacancy shall be excluded.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1603a by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 8.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1604.

Each member of the board, upon qualification, shall file with the executive officer the member’s post office address, and thereafter any notice of any change thereof. Any notice mailed to the address so on file, shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this chapter as to notice to that member of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 9.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1605.

Each appointing authority has power to remove from office at any time any member of the board appointed by that authority under Section 1603 pursuant to Section 106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 10.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1606.

The board shall elect a president, a vice president and a secretary from its membership. This section controls over the provisions of section 107 of this code with respect to the selection of officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 415.)
-------------------------------------------

1608.

Special meetings may be held at such times as the board may elect, or on the call of the president of the board, or of not less than four members thereof. A written notice of the time, place, and object of the special meeting shall be mailed by the executive officer to all the members not parties to the call, at least 15 days before the day of the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 4.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1609.

Meetings may be held at any time and place by unanimous consent evidenced either by writing or by the presence of any member whose consent is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1610.

Eight members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1092, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

The board shall carry out the purposes and enforce the provisions of this chapter. It shall examine all applicants for a license or permit to practice dentistry and dental assisting, according to the provisions of this chapter, and shall issue licenses and permits to practice dentistry and dental assisting in this state to such applicants as successfully pass all applicable licensing and permitting examinations administered by the board, or any regional or national testing entity designated to administer licensing or permitting examinations, and otherwise comply with the provisions of this chapter. The board shall collect and apply all fees as directed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 7.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.3.

The board shall require that the notice required under Section 138 includes a provision that the board is the entity that regulates dentists and dental assistants and provides the telephone number and
 internet website of the board. The board shall require the notice to be posted in a conspicuous location accessible to public view and accessible electronically for patients receiving dental services through telehealth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 12.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.5.

(a) The board may inspect the books, records, and premises of any dentist licensed under this chapter and the licensing documents, records, and premises of any dental assistant permitted under this chapter in response to a complaint that a dentist or dental assistant has violated any law or regulation that constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by the board, and may employ inspectors for this purpose.

(b) Failure to allow an inspection or any part thereof shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of the license or permit in accordance with Section 1670.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 9.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1612.

The board shall keep a record of the names of all persons to whom licenses or permits have been granted by it to practice dentistry, dental assisting, or any other function requiring a permit, and such other records as may be necessary to show plainly all of its acts and proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 10.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1613.

The board shall have and use a seal bearing the name “Dental Board of California.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 1.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1614.

The board may adopt regulations pursuant to this chapter concerning:

(a) The holding of meetings.

(b) The holding of examinations.

(c) The manner of issuance and reissuance of licenses.

(d) The establishment of standards for the approval of dental colleges and dental assisting programs and educational courses.

(e) Prescribing subjects in which applicants are to be examined.

(f) The administration and enforcement of this
 chapter.

Such rules shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 11.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1615.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 12.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1616.

The board shall have full power to employ all necessary investigators, clerical and other assistants and appoint its own attorney, prescribe his duties and fix his compensation. Members and employees of the board shall be entitled to other necessary traveling expenses. The investigators employed by the board shall be specifically trained to investigate dental practice activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 573.)
-------------------------------------------

1616.6.

There is hereby established within the board a full-time management level staff position, under the direction of the executive officer, whose responsibilities shall include the management of matters related to dental assisting, including, but not limited to, education, examination, licensure, and enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 14.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1617.

A copy of any part or all of the books of the board duly certified by the executive officer shall be primary evidence in any court of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 6.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1618.

(a) The original books, records, and papers of the board shall be kept at the office of the executive officer, which shall be at such place as may be designated by the board.

(b) The executive officer shall furnish to any person making application a copy of any part thereof, certified by the executive officer as executive officer, upon payment of the fee specified in Section 163. The fee shall be deposited in the State Dentistry Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 15.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1618.5.

(a) The board shall provide to the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care a copy of any accusation filed with the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, when the accusation is filed, for a violation of this chapter relating to the quality of care of any dental provider of a health care service plan, as defined in Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, the State of California, the Dental Board of California, the Department of Managed Health Care, the director of that department, or any officer, agent, employee, consultant, or contractor of
 the state or the board or the department for the release of any false or unauthorized information pursuant to this section, unless the release is made with knowledge and malice.

(b) The board and its executive officer and staff shall maintain the confidentiality of any nonpublic reports provided by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 1380 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 7.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1619.

All examination documentation of any applicant shall be preserved by the board for a period of no less than one year from the date of final successful examination, after which time the documentation shall be destroyed. Prior to destruction, examination documentation shall be open to inspection only by members of the board, by the applicant or by someone appointed by the latter to inspect them, by a court of competent jurisdiction in a proceeding where the question of the contents of the papers is properly involved, or by the director in accordance with Section 110 or 153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 16.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1619.1.

Notwithstanding Section 1619, the board need not retain the National Board of Dental Examiners’ examination papers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 872.)
-------------------------------------------

1621.

The board shall utilize in the administration of its licensure examinations only examiners whom it has appointed and who meet the following criteria:

(a) Possession of a valid license to practice dentistry in this state or possession of a valid license in one of the registered dental assistant categories licensed under this chapter.

(b) Practice as a licensed dentist or in a licensure category described in subdivision (a) for at least five years preceding the examiner’s appointment.

(c) Hold no position as an officer or faculty member at any college, school, or institution that
 provides instruction in the same licensure category as that held by the examiner. This subdivision shall not apply to a portfolio examiner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 18.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Admission and Practice [1625. - 1636.6.]

1625.

Dentistry is the diagnosis or treatment, by surgery or other method, of diseases and lesions and the correction of malpositions of the human teeth, alveolar process, gums, jaws, or associated structures; and such diagnosis or treatment may include all necessary related procedures as well as the use of drugs, anesthetic agents, and physical evaluation. Without limiting the foregoing, a person practices dentistry within the meaning of this chapter who does any one or more of the following:

(a) By card, circular, pamphlet, newspaper, internet website, social media, or in any other way advertises
 themselves or represents themselves to be a dentist.

(b) Performs, or offers to perform, an operation or diagnosis of any kind, or treats diseases or lesions of the human teeth, alveolar process, gums, jaws, or associated structures, or corrects malposed positions thereof.

(c) In any way indicates that the person will perform by
 themselves or their agents or servants any operation upon the human teeth, alveolar process, gums, jaws, or associated structures, or in any way indicates that the person will construct, alter, repair, or sell any bridge, crown, denture, or other prosthetic appliance or orthodontic appliance.

(d) Makes, or offers to make, an examination of, with the intent to perform or cause to be performed any operation on the human teeth, alveolar process, gums, jaws, or associated structures.

(e) Manages or conducts as manager, proprietor, conductor, lessor, or otherwise, a place where dental operations are
 performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 19.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.1.

(a) Any of the following entities may employ licensees and dental assistants and charge for the professional services they render, and shall not be deemed to be practicing dentistry within the meaning of Section 1625:

(1) A primary care clinic that is licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A primary care clinic that is exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A clinic owned or operated by a public hospital or
 health system.

(4) A clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The entities described in subdivision (a) shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a licensee or dental assistant lawfully acting within the licensee’s or dental assistant’s scope of practice as defined in this chapter. A requirement that licensees shall constitute all or a percentage of the governing body of the entity shall not be applicable to these entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 20.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.2.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 1625, the ownership or management, by a tax-exempt nonprofit corporation supported and maintained in whole or in substantial part by donations, bequests, gifts, grants, government funds, or contributions, that may be in the form of money, goods, or services, of a place where dental operations are performed, shall not be construed to be the unlicensed practice of dentistry, as long as all of the following apply:

(1) The entity obtains the board’s approval to offer dental services pursuant to regulations adopted by the board.

(2) The entity
 does nothing to interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of or provision of dental services by a licensee or dental assistant lawfully acting within the licensee’s or dental assistant’s scope of practice as defined in this chapter.

(3) The licensees and dental assistants of the entity providing services are in compliance with all applicable provisions of this chapter.

(4) The entity is otherwise in compliance with this chapter and all other applicable provisions of state and federal law.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following entities:

(1) A primary care clinic that is licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A primary care clinic that is exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A clinic owned or operated by a public hospital or health system.

(4) A clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 21.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the incapacity or death of a dentist, if the requirements of Section 1625.4 are met, any of the following persons may employ licensees and dental assistants and charge for the professional services they render for a period not to exceed 12 months from the date of the dentist’s death or incapacity without being deemed to be practicing dentistry within the meaning of Section 1625:

(1) The legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative of an incapacitated dentist.

(2) The executor or administrator of the estate of a dentist who is
 deceased.

(3) The named trustee or successor trustee of a trust or subtrust that owns assets consisting only of the incapacitated or deceased dentist’s dental practice and that was established solely for the purpose of disposition of the dental practice upon the dentist’s incapacity or death.

(b) The persons described in subdivision (a) shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a licensee or dental assistant lawfully acting within licensee’s or dental assistant’s scope of practice as defined in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 22.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.4.

(a) Where the dental practice of an incapacitated or deceased dentist is a sole proprietorship or where an incapacitated or deceased dentist is the sole shareholder of a professional dental corporation, a person identified in subdivision (a) of Section 1625.3 may enter into a contract with one or more dentists licensed in the state to continue the operations of the incapacitated or deceased dentist’s dental practice for a period of no more than 12 months from the date of death or incapacity, or until the practice is sold or otherwise disposed of, whichever occurs first, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The person identified in
 subdivision (a) of Section 1625.3 delivers to the board a notification of death or incapacity that includes all of the following information:

(A) The name and license number of the deceased or incapacitated dentist.

(B) The name and address of the dental practice.

(C) If the dentist is deceased, the name, address, and tax identification number of the estate or trust.

(D) The name and license number of each dentist who will operate the dental practice.

(E) A statement that the information provided is true and correct, and that the person identified in subdivision (a) of Section 1625.3 understands that
 any interference by the person or by
 the person’s assignee with the contracting dentist’s or dentists’ practice of dentistry or professional judgment is grounds for immediate termination of the operations of the dental practice without a hearing. The statement shall also provide that if the person required to make this notification willfully states as true any material fact that the person knows to be false, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in an action brought by any public prosecutor. A civil penalty imposed under this subparagraph shall be enforced as a civil judgment.

(2) The dentist or dentists who will operate the practice shall be licensed by the board and that license shall be current, valid, and shall not be suspended, restricted, or otherwise the subject of discipline.

(3) Within 30 days after the death or incapacity of a dentist, the person identified in subdivision (a) of Section 1625.3 or the contracting dentist or dentists shall send notification of the death or incapacity by mail to the last known address of each current patient of record with an explanation of how copies of the patient’s records may be obtained. This notice may also contain any other relevant information concerning the continuation of the dental practice. The failure to comply with the notification requirement within the 30-day period shall be grounds for terminating the operation of the dental practice under subdivision (b). The contracting dentist or dentists shall obtain a form signed by the patient, or the patient’s guardian or legal representative, that releases the patient’s confidential dental records to the contracting dentist
 or dentists prior to use of those records.

(b) The board may order the termination of the operations of a dental practice operating pursuant to this section if the board determines that the practice is operating in violation of this section. The board shall provide written notification at the address provided pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). If the board does not receive a written appeal of the determination that the practice is operating in violation of this section within 10 days of receipt of the notice, the determination to terminate the operations of the dental practice shall take effect immediately. If an appeal is received in a timely manner by the board, the executive officer of the board, or the officer’s designee, shall conduct an informal hearing. The decision of the executive officer or the executive
 officer’s designee shall be mailed to the practice no later than 10 days after the informal hearing, is the final decision in the matter, and is not subject to appeal under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if the board finds evidence that the person identified in subdivision (a) of Section 1625.3, or
 the person’s assignee, has interfered with the practice or professional judgment of the contracting dentist or dentists or otherwise finds evidence that a violation of this section constitutes an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare, the board may immediately order the termination of the operations of the dental practice without an informal hearing.

(d) A notice of an order of immediate termination of the dental practice without an informal hearing, as referenced in subdivision (b), shall be served by certified mail on the person identified in subdivision (a) of Section 1625.3 at the address provided pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), as appropriate, and on the contracting dentist or dentists at the address of the dental practice provided pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (a).

(e) A person receiving notice of an order of immediate termination pursuant to subdivision (d) may petition the board within 30 days of the date of service of the notice for an informal hearing before the executive officer or the executive officer’s designee, which shall take place within 30 days of the filing of the petition.

(f) A notice of the decision of the executive officer or the executive officer’s designee following an informal hearing held pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be served by certified mail on the person identified in subdivision (a) of Section 1625.3 at the address provided pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), as appropriate, and on the contracting dentist or dentists at the address of the dental
 practice provided pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(g) The board may require the submission to the board of any additional information necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 23.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.5.

The following written notification shall be included with, or as part of, all application forms required for a license to practice dentistry pursuant to this article and for renewal of that license pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1715): 
“Effective January 1, 2008, certain nondentists may, upon your death or incapacity, contract with another licensed dentist or dentists to continue your dental practice for a period not exceeding 12 months if certain conditions are met. Sections 1625.3 and
 1625.4 of the Business and Professions Code permit the legal guardian or conservator or authorized representative of an incapacitated dentist, the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased dentist, or the named trustee or successor trustee of a trust or subtrust who meets certain requirements, to contract with a licensed dentist or dentists to continue the incapacitated or deceased dentist’s dental practice for a period not to exceed 12 months from the date of death or incapacity if the practice meets specified criteria and if certain other conditions are met, including providing a specific notification to the Dental Board of California. You and your estate planner should become familiar with these requirements and the notification process. Please contact the Dental Board of California for additional information.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 433, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.6.

(a) In addition to the actions authorized under Section 1625, a dentist may independently prescribe and administer influenza and COVID-19 vaccines, consistent with recommendations adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code, to persons 3 years of age or older.

(b) In order to prescribe and administer a vaccine described in subdivision (a), a dentist shall do all of the following:

(1) Complete an immunization training program biennially that is either offered by the CDC or taken through a registered provider approved by the board that, at a minimum, includes vaccine administration, prevention and management of adverse reactions, and maintenance of vaccine records.

(2) Comply with all state and federal recordkeeping and reporting requirements, including providing documentation to the patient’s primary care provider, if applicable, and entering in the information in the appropriate immunization registry designated by the Immunization Branch of the State Department of Public Health.

(c) The board may adopt regulations to implement this section. The adoption,
 amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the 180-day period, as applicable to the effective period of an emergency regulatory action and submission of specified materials to the Office of Administrative Law, is hereby extended to 240 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 5.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the practice of dentistry in the state, either privately or as an employee of a governmental agency or political subdivision, unless the person has a valid, unexpired license or special permit from the board.

The following practices, acts and operations, however, are exempt from the operation of this chapter:

(a) The practice of oral surgery by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Medical Practice Act.

(b) The operations, in dental schools approved by the board, of bona fide students of dentistry or dental hygiene in the
 school’s clinical departments or laboratories or in a dental extension
 program approved by the board or in an advanced dental education program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or a national accrediting body approved by the board.

(c) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of other states or countries while appearing and operating as bona fide clinicians or instructors in dental colleges approved by the Dental Board of California.

(d) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of other states or countries in conducting or making a clinical demonstration before any bona fide dental or medical society, association, or convention; provided, however, the consent of the Dental Board of California to the making and conducting of the clinical demonstration shall be